Washington statutes.
RCW 39.106.080

Conversion of existing entities into authorities.

(1) Any intergovernmental entity formed under chapter 39.34 RCW or other applicable law may become a joint municipal utility services authority and be entitled to all the powers and privileges available under this chapter, if: (a) The public agencies that are parties to an existing interlocal agreement would otherwise be eligible to form an authority to provide the relevant utility services; (b) the public agencies that are parties to the existing interlocal agreement amend, restate, or replace that interlocal agreement so that it materially complies with the requirements of RCW 39.106.050; (c) the amended, restated, or replacement agreement is filed with the Washington state secretary of state consistent with RCW 39.106.030; and (d) the amended, restated, or replacement agreement expressly provides that all rights and obligations of the entity formerly existing under chapter 39.34 RCW or other applicable law shall thereafter be the obligations of the new authority created under this chapter. Upon compliance with those requirements, the new authority shall be a successor of the former intergovernmental entity for all purposes, and all rights and obligations of the former entity shall transfer to the new authority. Those obligations shall be treated as having been incurred, entered into, or issued by the new authority, and those obligations shall remain in full force and effect and shall continue to be enforceable in accordance with their terms.

(2) If an interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW or other applicable law relating to utility services includes among its original participants a city or county that does not itself provide or no longer provides utility services, that city or county may continue as a party to the amended, restated, or replacement agreement and shall be treated as a member for all purposes under this chapter.

[ 2011 c 258 s 8.]